Washington statutes.
RCW 36.21.070

New construction building permits—Appraisal of building.

Upon receipt of a copy of a building permit, the county assessor shall, within twelve months of the date of issue of such permit, proceed to make a physical appraisal of the building or buildings covered by the permit.

[ 1989 c 246 s 3; 1987 c 134 s 1; 1963 c 4 s 36.21.070. Prior: 1955 c 129 s 4.]